dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="खोल्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ना</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ग__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="भोगि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहनु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="दिइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहे</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सोध__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रोक्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हप्काउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुहोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="चिप्लि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हाल्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="काट/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मिल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दैन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खोस/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उठ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="विर्स__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="चाहन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>थें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हिंड/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="बच/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाऔं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कुट्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोस</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हाँस/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौंला</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्तै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ता</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लुछ्ल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ास्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    </pardefs>

    <e lm="विर्स"><i>विर्स</i><par n="विर्स__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मिल्"><i>मिल</i><par n="मिल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="देखाइ"><i>देखाइ</i><par n="ग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भोगि"><i>भोगि</i><par n="भोगि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खोल्"><i>खोल्</i><par n="खोल्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिइ"><i>दिइ</i><par n="दिइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खोस्"><i>खोस</i><par n="खोस/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="काट्"><i>काट</i><par n="काट/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चिप्लि"><i>चिप्लि</i><par n="चिप्लि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हप्काउ"><i>हप्काउ</i><par n="हप्काउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रोक्"><i>रोक्</i><par n="रोक्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हिंड्"><i>हिंड</i><par n="हिंड/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="हरा"><i>हरा</i><par n="ग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="कुट्"><i>कुट्</i><par n="कुट्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उठ"><i>उठ</i><par n="उठ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बच्"><i>बच</i><par n="बच/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="चाहन्"><i>चाहन्</i><par n="चाहन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लुछ्ल्"><i>लुछ्ल</i><par n="लुछ्ल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सोध"><i>सोध</i><par n="सोध__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ग"><i>ग</i><par n="ग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हाँस्"><i>हाँस</i><par n="हाँस/्__vblex"/></e>
